California, session 20252026, AB403.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14132.37 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, immediately following Section 14132.36, to read:14132.37. (a) For purposes of this section, “community health worker” or “CHW” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 18998. The term includes, among other persons listed in that subdivision, promotores and community health representatives.(b)The department shall annually review the outreach and education efforts that are conducted by Medi-Cal managed care plans pursuant to Section 14132.36.(c)(b) On an annual basis, the department shall conduct an analysis of the CHW services benefit covered under Section 14132.36, submit each the analysis to the Legislature in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and publish each the analysis on the department’s internet website. The department shall complete, submit, and publish the first analysis by July 1, 2027.(d)(c) The analysis described in subdivision (c) (b) shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:(1)An assessment of CHW capacity and the needs of Medi-Cal beneficiaries, including those enrolled in Medi-Cal managed care plans or under the fee-for-service delivery system.(2)A disaggregation of the assessment described in paragraph (1) by geographic region, race, ethnicity, language, age, and other sociodemographic factors, and by Medi-Cal managed care plan as applicable, including all of the following:(A)The types of services provided by CHWs to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.(B)The number of eligible Medi-Cal beneficiaries.(C)The number of referrals by provider type.(D)The number of contracted CHWs by employer type, including, but not limited to, community-based organizations, licensed providers, clinics, or hospitals.(E)The racial, ethnic, age, regional, and linguistic diversity of CHWs.(F)The total number of Medi-Cal beneficiaries served, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, language, age, and other sociodemographic factors.(G)The number of contracted CHW entities needed to meet the expected demand for CHW services.(1) An assessment of the outreach and education efforts that are conducted by each Medi-Cal managed care plan pursuant to Section 14132.36.(2) An assessment of the CHW benefit utilization and services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries eligible for the CHW Medi-Cal benefit, including those enrolled in Medi-Cal managed care plans or under the fee-for-service delivery system, including the following:(A) Of the specific services described in the CHW benefit, the relative frequency of each service being provided by CHWs to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.(B) An estimate of the number of eligible Medi-Cal beneficiaries.(C) The number of referrals by provider type.(D) The number of CHWs providing the CHW benefit, by employer type, including, but not limited to, community-based organizations, licensed providers, clinics, or hospitals.(E) The number of CHWs needed to meet the expected demand for CHW services.(3) A demographic disaggregation of the CHWs providing the CHW benefit and of the Medi-Cal beneficiaries receiving services through the benefit by geographic region, race, ethnicity, language, age, and other sociodemographic factors, and by Medi-Cal managed care plan as applicable.(3)(4) Data on Medi-Cal reimbursements for CHW services billed to the department. The data shall include the total amount, in dollars, reimbursed to providers and supervising entities in the provision of CHW services.(e)(d) The demographic data that are submitted and published as part of the department’s analysis under this section shall include only data that are statistically significant.(f)(e) For purposes of protecting the privacy of Medi-Cal beneficiaries, the collection, submission, publication, and other reporting of data under this section shall exclude any personally identifiable information.